Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MACALESTER COLLEGE GEOTHERMAL ENERGY SYSTEM.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $2,570,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to Macalester College in St. Paul to construct an aquifer-based geothermal energy system that provides space heating and cooling to a new campus residence hall and welcome center, with the capacity for future expansion to serve as a district heating and cooling plant for all campus buildings north of Grand Avenue. The appropriation under this section is available until expended. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "aquifer-based geothermal energy system" means a system composed of wells that access underground aquifers, heat pumps that transfer thermal energy between buildings and the aquifer, heat exchangers, and associated distribution infrastructure. new text end